Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2336.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-243, to read: START_STATUTE20-243. Health insurers; vaccine mandate; prohibition; definition A. Beginning January 1, 2027, a contract that is issued, delivered or renewed by a health insurer may not include a vaccine mandate as a condition of coverage. B. For the purposes of this section, "Health insurer" means a disability insurer, group disability insurer, blanket disability insurer, health care services organization, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation or hospital, medical, dental and optometric service corporation. END_STATUTE